California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) A retailer is relieved from liability to collect use tax that became due and payable, insofar as the measure of the tax is represented by accounts that have been found to be worthless and charged off for income tax purposes by the retailer or, if the retailer is not required to file income tax returns, charged off in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A retailer that has previously paid the amount of the tax may, under rules and regulations prescribed by the department, take as a deduction the amount found worthless and charged off by the retailer. If these accounts are thereafter in whole or in part collected by the retailer, the amount collected shall be included in the first return filed after the collection and the amount of the tax shall be paid with the return.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 12.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6204.

The tax required to be collected by the retailer and any amount unreturned to the customer which is not tax but was collected from the customer under the representation by the retailer that it was tax constitutes debts owed by the retailer to this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

6205.

It is unlawful for any retailer to advertise or hold out or state to the public or to any customer, directly or indirectly, that the tax or any part thereof will be assumed or absorbed by the retailer or that it will not be added to the selling price of the property sold or that if added it or any part thereof will be refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6206.

The tax required to be collected by the retailer from the purchaser shall be displayed separately from the list price, the price advertised in the premises, the marked price, or other price on the sales check or other proof of sales.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6207.

Any person violating Sections 6203, 6205, or 6206 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration [6225. - 6226.]

6225.

(a) In order to facilitate the collection of use tax imposed by this part, a qualified purchaser shall register with the department on a form prescribed by the department and shall set forth the name under which the qualified purchaser transacts or intends to transact business, the location of the qualified purchaser’s place or places of business, and other information as the department may require.

(b) Article 1 (commencing with Section 6451) of Chapter 5 shall apply to a qualified purchaser, except that a return showing the total sales price of the tangible personal property purchased by the
 qualified purchaser, the storage, use, or other consumption of which became subject to the use tax during the preceding calendar year, and which was not paid to a retailer required to collect the tax or which was not paid to a retailer the qualified purchaser reasonably believed was required to collect the tax, shall be filed, together with a remittance of the amount of the tax due, with the department on or before April 15.

(c) A “qualified purchaser” means a person that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The person is not required to hold a seller’s permit pursuant to this part.

(2) The person is not required to be registered pursuant to Section 6226.

(3) The person is not a holder of a use tax direct payment permit as described in Section 7051.3.

(4) The person makes more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in purchases subject to use tax per calendar year and that tax has not otherwise been paid on those purchases to a retailer engaged in business in this state or to a retailer who is authorized by the department, under the rules and regulations as it may prescribe, to collect the tax.

(5) The person is not otherwise registered with the
 department to report use tax.

(d) This section shall not apply to the purchase of a vehicle, vessel, or aircraft as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 6271) of Chapter 3.5.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 355, Sec. 1.   (AB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 355.)
-------------------------------------------

6225.

(a) In order to facilitate the collection of use tax imposed by this part, a qualified purchaser shall register with the board on a form prescribed by the board and shall set forth the name under which the qualified purchaser transacts or intends to transact business, the location of the qualified purchaser’s place or places of business, and other information as the board may require.

(b) Article 1 (commencing with Section 6451) of Chapter 5 shall apply to a qualified purchaser, except that a return showing the total sales price of the tangible personal property purchased by the qualified purchaser, the storage, use, or other consumption of which became subject to the
 use tax during the preceding calendar year, and which was not paid to a retailer required to collect the tax or which was not paid to a retailer the qualified purchaser reasonably believed was required to collect the tax, shall be filed, together with a remittance of the amount of the tax due, with the board on or before April 15.

(c) A “qualified purchaser” means a person that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The person is not required to hold a seller’s permit pursuant to this part.

(2) The person is not required to be registered pursuant to Section 6226.

(3) The person is not a holder of a use tax direct payment permit as described in Section 7051.3.

(4) The person receives at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in gross receipts from business operations per calendar year.

(5) The person is not otherwise registered with the board to report use tax.

(d) This section shall not apply to the purchase of a vehicle, vessel, or aircraft as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 6271) of Chapter 3.5.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 355, Sec. 2.   (AB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6226.

Every retailer selling tangible personal property for storage, use, or other consumption in this State shall register with the board and give the name and address of all agents operating in this State, the location of all distribution or sales houses or offices or other places of business in this State, and such other information as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Presumptions and Resale Certificates [6241. - 6249.]

6241.

For the purpose of the proper administration of this part and to prevent evasion of the use tax and the duty to collect the use tax, it shall be presumed that tangible personal property sold by any person for delivery in this State is sold for storage, use, or other consumption in this State until the contrary is established. The burden of proving the contrary is upon the person who makes the sale unless he takes from the purchaser a certificate to the effect that the property is purchased for resale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6242.

The certificate relieves the person selling the property from the duty of collecting the use tax only if taken in good faith from a person who is engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property and who holds the permit provided for by Article 2 (commencing with Section 6066) of Chapter 2 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6243.

The certificate shall be signed by and bear the name and address of the purchaser, shall indicate the number of the permit issued to the purchaser, and shall indicate the general character of the tangible personal property sold by the purchaser in the regular course of business. The certificate shall be substantially in such form as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6243.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person, other than a person exempt from payment of use tax in accordance with Section 6352, who leases mobile transportation equipment and who cannot otherwise properly issue a resale certificate may issue such a certificate for the limited purpose of reporting his use tax liability based on fair rental value as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 6094 and subdivision (d) of Section 6244.

With respect to matters arising out of mergers or acquisitions, the provisions of this section shall apply to any matters pending before the board on the effective date of this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

6244.

(a) If a purchaser who gives a resale certificate or purchases property for the purpose of reselling it makes any storage or use of the property other than retention, demonstration, or display while holding it for sale in the regular course of business, the storage or use is taxable as of the time the property is first so stored or used.

(b) If such use is limited to the loan of the property to customers as an accommodation while awaiting delivery of property purchased or leased from the lender or while property is being repaired for
 customers by the lender, the measure of the tax is the fair rental value of the property for the duration of each loan so made.

(c) If the property is used frequently for purposes of demonstration or display while holding it for sale in the regular course of business and is used partly for other purposes, the measure of the tax is the fair rental value of the property for the period of such other use or uses.

(d) If the property is mobile transportation equipment as defined in Section 6023, and the use is limited to leasing the equipment, the purchaser may elect to pay his use tax measured by the fair rental value, if the election is made on or before the due date of a return for the period in which the equipment is first leased. The election must be made by reporting tax measured by the fair rental value on the return for that period, or in such other manner as the board may
 prescribe. Tax must thereafter be paid with the return for each reporting period, measured by the fair rental value, whether the equipment is within or without the state. The election may not be revoked with respect to the equipment as to which it is made.

(e) As used in subdivision (d), the term “fair rental value” means the rentals required by the purchaser under the lease except where the board determines that such rentals are nominal. The term shall not include any reimbursement payments made by the lessee to the purchaser for such use tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1352, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

6245.

If a purchaser gives a certificate with respect to the purchase of fungible goods, or purchases those goods for resale in the regular course of business, and thereafter commingles these goods with other fungible goods not so purchased but of such similarity that the identity of the constituent goods in the commingled mass can not be determined, sales from the mass of commingled goods shall be deemed to be sales of the goods so purchased until a quantity of commingled goods equal to the quantity of purchased goods so commingled has been sold. Goods removed from the commingled mass for consumption shall be deemed to be consumption of goods not so
 purchased until a quantity of commingled goods equal to the quantity of goods not so purchased has been consumed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 337, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6245.5.

(a) A person qualified under subdivision (b) may issue a certificate to a retailer with respect to the amount of manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 4081 or 4091 of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6011 or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6012 when purchasing fuel from the retailer.

(b) A person is qualified for purposes of this section if
 all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The person was entitled to either a direct refund or credit against his or her income tax for the manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 4081 or 4091 of the Internal Revenue Code for more than 50 percent of the person’s purchases of fuel during the prior calendar year.

(2) The person’s business remains substantially the same as during the prior calendar year whereby the person expects to be entitled to either a direct refund or credit against his or her income tax for the manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 4081 or 4091 of the Internal Revenue Code for more than 50 percent of the person’s purchases of fuel.

(3) The person holds a valid California seller’s permit.

(c) A person issuing a certificate for purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6011 or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6012 is liable for use tax on the amount of the manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 4081 or 4091 of the Internal Revenue Code if the person used fuel purchased under the certificate in a manner whereby the person is not entitled to a direct refund or credit against his or her income tax of the federal excise tax.

(d) A person liable for the use tax under subdivision (c) of this section shall report and pay that use tax with the return for the reporting period in which the person uses the fuel in such a manner that the person is not entitled to a direct refund or credit against his or her income tax of the federal excise tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 1.6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6246.

It shall be further presumed that tangible personal property shipped or brought to this State by the purchaser was purchased from a retailer on or after July 1, 1935, for storage, use, or other consumption in this State.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6245 by Stats. 1943, Ch. 699.)
-------------------------------------------

6247.

On and after the effective date of this section, it shall be further presumed that tangible personal property delivered outside this State to a purchaser known by the retailer to be a resident of this State was purchased from a retailer for storage, use or other consumption in this State and stored, used or otherwise consumed in this State.

This presumption may be controverted by a statement in writing, signed by the purchaser or his authorized representative, and retained by the vendor, that the property was purchased for use at a designated point or points outside this State. This presumption may also be controverted by other
 evidence satisfactory to the board that the property was not purchased for storage, use, or other consumption in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1656.)
-------------------------------------------

6248.

(a) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that any vehicle, vessel, or aircraft bought outside of this state on or after the effective date of this section, and which is brought into California within 12 months from the date of its purchase, was acquired for storage, use, or other consumption in this state and is subject to use tax if any of the following occurs:

(1) The vehicle, vessel, or aircraft was purchased by a California resident as defined in Section 516 of the Vehicle Code. For purposes of this section, a closely held corporation or limited liability company shall also be considered a California resident if 50 percent or more of the shares or membership interests are held by shareholders or members who are residents of California as defined in Section 516 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) In the case of a vehicle, the vehicle was subject to registration under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code during the first 12 months of ownership.

(3) In the case of a vessel or aircraft, that vessel or aircraft was subject to property tax in this state during the first 12 months of ownership.

(4) If purchased by a nonresident of California, the vehicle, vessel, or aircraft is used or stored in this state more than one-half of the time during the first 12 months of ownership.

(b) This presumption may be controverted by documentary evidence that the vehicle, vessel, or aircraft was purchased for use outside of this state during the first 12 months of ownership. This evidence may include, but is not limited to, evidence of registration of that vehicle, vessel, or aircraft, with the proper authority, outside of this state.

(c) This section shall not apply to any vehicle, vessel, or aircraft used in interstate or foreign commerce pursuant to regulations prescribed by the board.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall not apply to any vehicle, vessel, or
 aircraft that is either purchased, or is the subject of a binding purchase contract that is entered into, on or before the operative date of this subdivision.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any aircraft or vessel brought into this state exclusively for the purpose of repair, retrofit, or modification shall not be deemed to be acquired for storage, use, or other consumption in this state if the repair, retrofit, or modification is, in the case of a vessel, performed by a repair facility that holds an appropriate permit issued by the board and is licensed to do business by the city, county, or city and county in which it is located if the city, county, or city and county so requires, or, in the case of an aircraft, performed by a repair station certified by the Federal Aviation Administration or a manufacturer’s maintenance facility.

(f) The presumption set forth in
 subdivision (a) may be controverted by documentary evidence that the vehicle was brought into this state for the exclusive purpose of warranty or repair service and was used or stored in this state for that purpose for 30 days or less. The 30-day period begins when the vehicle enters this state, includes any time of travel to and from the warranty or repair facility, and ends when the vehicle is returned to a point outside the state. The documentary evidence shall include a work order stating the dates that the vehicle is in the possession of the warranty or repair facility and a statement by the owner of the vehicle specifying dates of travel to and from the warranty or repair facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 5.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6249.

A member of the armed services on active duty who purchases a vehicle prior to the effective date of his discharge shall not be subject to the presumption established by Section 6248. He shall not be deemed to have purchased the vehicle for storage, use or other consumption in this State unless at the time of purchase he intended to use it in this State, such intent resulting from his own determination, rather than from official orders received as a member of the armed services transferring him to this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1858.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.3. Vehicle Smog Impact Fee [6263. - 6263.]

6263.

No person, other than the manufacturer who has received authorization to sell the motor vehicle in California or a person authorized by the manufacturer, shall install a vehicle emission control label on any motor vehicle. No person shall remove, alter, deface, obscure, or destroy a vehicle emission control label or any label required to be affixed to any motor vehicle certified pursuant to the National Emissions Standards Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7521 et seq., and Subpart A (commencing with Sec. 86.078-3) of Part 86 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations).
 Any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 32, Sec. 4.   Effective June 8, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Vehicles, Vessels and Aircraft [6271. - 6295.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [6271. - 6277.]

6271.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6272.

“Vehicle” is as defined in Section 670 of the Vehicle Code and shall include off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

6273.

“Vessel” means any boat, ship, barge, craft, or floating thing designed for navigation in the water except:

(a) A seaplane,

(b) A watercraft specifically designed to operate on a permanently fixed course, the movement of which is restricted to or guided on such permanently fixed course by means of a mechanical device on a fixed track or arm to which the watercraft is attached or by which the watercraft is controlled, or by means of a mechanical device attached to the watercraft itself,

(c) A watercraft of a type designed to be propelled solely by oars or paddles, 

(d) A watercraft of eight feet or less in length of a type designed to be propelled by sail.

A motor or other component of a vessel, whether or not detachable, shall be deemed to be part of the vessel when sold therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1634.)
-------------------------------------------

6274.

“Aircraft” means any contrivance designed for powered navigation in the air except a rocket or missile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1589, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

6275.

(a) Every person making any retail sale of a mobilehome or commercial coach required to be registered annually under the Health and Safety Code, or of a vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code or subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code, or a vehicle that qualifies under the permanent trailer identification plate program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code, or of a vessel or an aircraft as defined in this
 article, is a retailer for the purposes of this part of the vehicle, vessel, or aircraft, regardless of whether he or she is a retailer by reason of other provisions of this part, unless another person is the retailer, as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) Every person, licensed or certificated under the Health and Safety Code or the Vehicle Code as a dealer, is the retailer of a mobilehome or commercial coach required to be registered annually under the Health and Safety Code or of a vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code or subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code or a vehicle that qualifies under the permanent trailer identification plate program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code, when a retail sale of the vehicle is made through him or her and that person provides to the Department of Housing and Community Development or the Department
 of Motor Vehicles a notice of transfer with respect to the vehicle pursuant to Section 18080.5 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 5901 or Section 38200 of the Vehicle Code. That person shall hold a seller’s permit and remit tax to the board with respect to those sales in the same manner as a dealer licensed or certificated under the Vehicle Code and making sales on his or her own account. For purposes of this subdivision, “sale” does not include a lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 6.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

6276.1.

(a) For purposes of Section 6276, “sales price” of a used mobilehome, as defined in Section 18014 of the Health and Safety Code shall be based on the current value of the used mobilehome as specified by a recognized value guide. If the value guide does not specify the model or manufacturer of a used mobilehome the value of the used mobilehome shall be established by reference to the highest value in the value guide according to age and size or the actual sales price, whichever is less. If the actual sales price of a used mobilehome is less than the current value specified in the value guide, the “sales
 price” shall be based on the actual sales price of the mobilehome as evidenced by the purchase documents. The State Board of Equalization shall approve the value guides for use within this state through regulation.

(b) For purposes of Section 6276, “sales price” of a mobilehome, whether new or used, shall exclude the amount of separately stated escrow fees on the sale of the mobilehome.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the “actual sales price” means the total contract price, including, but not limited to, the value of the mobilehome, its in place location value, awning, skirting, carport, patio, landscaping, shrubs, unattached furnishings, or other items not part of the mobilehome, and documentation fees.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 932) by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1539, Sec. 4.   Effective October 2, 1985.   Operative January 1, 1986, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1539.)
-------------------------------------------

6277.

There shall be a presumption that a transfer of a vehicle to a lessee by a lessor, as defined in Section 372 of the Vehicle Code, was a sale for resale if the lessee transfers title and registration to a third party within 10 days from the date the lessee acquired title from the lessor at the expiration or termination of a lease. The presumption may be rebutted by evidence that the sale was not for resale prior to use.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to recognize the delay in processing documents when a lessee wishes to transfer title of a leased vehicle to a third party at the expiration or
 termination of a lease rather than acquiring a vehicle for his or her own use.

This section does not provide an exemption for any use by a lessee after the expiration or termination of a lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Special Exemptions [6281. - 6285.]

6281.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, a mobilehome or commercial coach required to be annually registered under the Health and Safety Code, or a vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code or subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code, or a vessel or aircraft, when such property is included in any transfer of all or substantially all the property held or used in the course of business activities of the person selling the property and when after such transfer the real or
 ultimate ownership of such property is substantially similar to that which existed before such transfer. For the purposes of this section, stockholders, bondholders, partners, or other persons holding an interest in a corporation or other entity are regarded as having the “real or ultimate ownership” of the property of that corporation or other entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 975, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

6282.

There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from sales of mobilehomes or commercial coaches required to be annually registered under the Health and Safety Code or vehicles required to be registered under the Vehicle Code when the retailer is other than a person licensed or certificated pursuant to the Health and Safety Code or the Vehicle Code as a manufacturer, remanufacturer, dealer, dismantler, or lessor-retailer, subject to Section 11615.5 of the Vehicle Code.

This exemption does not extend to the rentals payable under a lease of tangible personal
 property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6283.

(a) There are exempted from the computation of the amount of the sales tax the gross receipts from the sale in this state of a vehicle subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code or of a vessel or of an aircraft when the retailer is other than a person required to hold a seller’s permit pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6066) of Chapter 2 by reason of the number, scope, and character of his or her sales of those vehicles, vessels, or of aircraft, as the case may be.

(b) The exemption provided in subdivision (a) shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) Any sale of a vehicle required to be identified under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code when the retailer is a person licensed or certificated pursuant to the Vehicle Code as a manufacturer, remanufacturer, dealer, or dismantler.

(2) Any sale of a vessel or an aircraft when a broker arranges the sale between two private parties and the broker collects sales tax reimbursement on the transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6284.

If a person is engaged in the business of selling vehicles, mobilehomes, commercial coaches, vessels or aircraft he or she shall not be excused from the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 6066) of Chapter 2 of this part, by reason of the exemptions provided in Sections 6282 and 6283.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1589, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

6285.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of a mobilehome or commercial coach required to be registered annually under the Health and Safety Code, or of a vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code, or of a vehicle subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code, or a vehicle that qualifies under the permanent trailer identification plate program pursuant to
 subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code, or of a vessel or an aircraft, when either of the following occurs:

(a) The person selling the property is either the parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, or spouse, or the brother or sister if the sale between that brother or sister is between two minors related by blood or adoption, of the purchaser, and the person selling is not engaged in the business of selling the type of property for which the exemption is claimed.

(b) The sale is to a revocable trust in which all of the following occur:

(1) The seller has an unrestricted power to revoke the trust.

(2) The sale does not result in any change in the beneficial ownership of the property.

(3) The trust provides that upon revocation the property will revert wholly to the seller.

(4) The only consideration for the sale is the assumption by the trust of an existing loan for which the tangible personal property being transferred is the sole collateral for the assumed loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 6.1.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Auxiliary Collection Provisions [6291. - 6295.]

6291.

Notwithstanding Section 6451, the use taxes imposed by this part with respect to the storage, use or other consumption in this state of a mobilehome or commercial coach required to be registered annually under the Health and Safety Code, or of a vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code, or of a vehicle subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code, or a vehicle that qualifies under the permanent trailer identification plate program pursuant to subdivision (a) of
 Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code, or of a vessel or an aircraft as defined in this chapter are due and payable by the purchaser at the time the storage, use, or other consumption of the property first becomes taxable. Delinquency penalties and interest with respect to use tax for mobilehomes or commercial coaches registered annually with the Department of Housing and Community Development or for vehicles registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles shall be as provided in Section 6292. Delinquency penalties and interest with respect to use tax for vehicles subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code or a vehicle that qualifies under the permanent trailer identification plate program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code shall be as provided in Section 6293. Delinquency penalties and interest with respect to use tax for vessels and aircraft shall be imposed as if the due date of the tax were fixed by Section
 6451.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 6.2.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

6292.

(a) Except when the sale is by lease, when a mobilehome or commercial coach required to be registered annually under the Health and Safety Code or a vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code is sold at retail by other than a person licensed or certificated pursuant to the Health and Safety Code or the Vehicle Code as a manufacturer, remanufacturer, dealer, dismantler, or lessor-retailer, subject to Section 11615.5 of the Vehicle Code, the retailer is not required or authorized to collect the use tax from the purchaser, but the purchaser of the vehicle shall pay the use tax to the
 Department of Housing and Community Development acting for and on behalf of the board pursuant to Section 18123 of the Health and Safety Code or to the Department of Motor Vehicles acting for and on behalf of the board pursuant to Section 4750.5 of the Vehicle Code. 

(b) If the purchaser makes an application to either department which is not timely, and is subject to penalty because of delinquency in effecting registration or transfer of registration of the vehicle, he or she then becomes liable also for penalty as specified in Section 6591, but no interest shall accrue. 

(c) Application to the appropriate department by the purchaser relieves the purchaser of the obligation to file a return with the board under Section 6452. 

(d) If the purchaser does not make application to either department, or does not pay the
 amount of use tax due, or files a return with the board under Section 6455 which is not timely, interest and penalties shall apply with respect to the unpaid amount as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6451).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 236, Sec. 2.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6293.

(a) Except when the sale is by lease, when a vehicle subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code or a vehicle that qualifies under the permanent trailer identification plate program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code, is sold at retail by other than a person licensed or certificated pursuant to the Vehicle Code as a manufacturer, remanufacturer, dealer, dismantler, or lessor-retailer, subject to Section 11615.5 of the Vehicle
 Code, or a person required to hold a seller’s permit pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6066) of Chapter 2 by reason of the number, scope, and character of his or her sales of those vehicles, the retailer is not required or authorized to collect the use tax from the purchaser, but the purchaser of the vehicle shall pay the use tax to the Department of Motor Vehicles acting for and on behalf of the board pursuant to Section 38211 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) If the purchaser makes an application to that department which is not timely, and is subject to penalty because of delinquency in effecting identification or transfer of ownership of the vehicle, he or she then becomes liable also for penalty as specified in Section 6591 of this code, but no interest shall accrue.

(c) Application to that department by the purchaser relieves the purchaser of the obligation to file a
 return with the board under Section 6452.

(d) If the purchaser does not make application to that department, or does not pay the amount of use tax due, or files a return with the board under Section 6455 which is not timely, interest and penalties shall apply with respect to the unpaid amount as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6451).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 6.3.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

6294.

(a) When an undocumented vessel required to be registered under the Vehicle Code is sold at retail by other than a person holding a seller’s permit and regularly engaged in the business of selling vessels, the retailer is not required or authorized to collect the use tax from the purchaser, but the purchaser of the vessel must pay the use tax to the Department of Motor Vehicles acting for, and on behalf of, the board pursuant to Section 9928 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) If the purchaser makes an application to the department which is not timely, and is subject to penalty
 because of delinquency in effecting registration or transfer of registration of the undocumented vessel, he or she then becomes liable also for penalty as specified in Section 6591, but no interest shall accrue. 

(c) Application to the department by the purchaser shall relieve the purchaser of the obligation to file a return with the board under Section 6452.

(d) If the purchaser does not make application to either department, or does not pay the amount of use tax due, or files a return with the board under Section 6455 which is not timely, interest and penalties shall apply with respect to the unpaid amount as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6451).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 665, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6295.
